Illinois, session 104th, SB2462.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 1-110.16 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/1-110.16)7    Sec. 1-110.16. Transactions prohibited by retirement 8systems; companies that boycott Israel, for-profit companies 9that contract to shelter migrant children, Iran-restricted 10companies, Sudan-restricted companies, expatriated entities, 11companies that are domiciled or have their principal place of 12business in Russia or Belarus, and companies that are subject 13to Russian Harmful Foreign Activities Sanctions.14    (a) As used in this Section:15        "Boycott Israel" means engaging in actions that are 16    politically motivated and are intended to penalize, 17    inflict economic harm on, or otherwise limit commercial 18    relations with the State of Israel or companies based in 19    the State of Israel or in territories controlled by the 20    State of Israel.21        "Company" means any sole proprietorship, organization, 22    association, corporation, partnership, joint venture, 23    limited partnership, limited liability partnership,   SB2462- 2 -LRB104 09315 RPS 19373 b1    limited liability company, or other entity or business 2    association, including all wholly owned subsidiaries, 3    majority-owned subsidiaries, parent companies, or 4    affiliates of those entities or business associations, 5    that exist for the purpose of making profit.6        "Company that is subject to Russian Harmful Foreign 7    Activities Sanctions" means a company that is subject to 8    sanctions under the Russian Harmful Foreign Activities 9    Sanctions Regulations (31 CFR Part 587), any Presidential 10    Executive Order imposing sanctions against Russia, or any 11    federal directive issued pursuant to any such Executive 12    Order. 13        "Contract to shelter migrant children" means entering 14    into a contract with the federal government to shelter 15    migrant children under the federal Unaccompanied Alien 16    Children Program or a substantially similar federal 17    program. 18        "Direct holdings" in a company means all publicly 19    traded securities of that company that are held directly 20    by the retirement system in an actively managed account or 21    fund in which the retirement system owns all shares or 22    interests.23        "Expatriated entity" has the meaning ascribed to it in 24    Section 1-15.120 of the Illinois Procurement Code. 25        "Illinois Investment Policy Board" means the board 26    established under subsection (b) of this Section.   SB2462- 3 -LRB104 09315 RPS 19373 b1        "Indirect holdings" in a company means all securities 2    of that company that are held in an account or fund, such 3    as a mutual fund, managed by one or more persons not 4    employed by the retirement system, in which the retirement 5    system owns shares or interests together with other 6    investors not subject to the provisions of this Section or 7    that are held in an index fund.8        "Iran-restricted company" means a company that meets 9    the qualifications under Section 1-110.15 of this Code.10        "Private market fund" means any private equity fund, 11    private equity funds of funds, venture capital fund, hedge 12    fund, hedge fund of funds, real estate fund, or other 13    investment vehicle that is not publicly traded.14        "Restricted companies" means companies that boycott 15    Israel, for-profit companies that contract to shelter 16    migrant children, Iran-restricted companies, 17    Sudan-restricted companies, expatriated entities, 18    companies that are domiciled or have their principal place 19    of business in Russia or Belarus, and companies that are 20    subject to Russian Harmful Foreign Activities Sanctions.21        "Retirement system" means a retirement system 22    established under Article 2, 14, 15, 16, or 18 of this Code 23    or the Illinois State Board of Investment.24        "Sudan-restricted company" means a company that meets 25    the qualifications under Section 1-110.6 of this Code.26    (b) There shall be established an Illinois Investment   SB2462- 4 -LRB104 09315 RPS 19373 b1Policy Board. The Illinois Investment Policy Board shall 2consist of 7 members. Each board of a pension fund or 3investment board created under Article 15, 16, or 22A of this 4Code shall appoint one member, and the Governor shall appoint 54 members. The Governor shall designate one member of the 6Board as the Chairperson. 7    (b-5) The term of office of each member appointed by the 8Governor, who is serving on the Board on June 30, 2022, is 9abolished on that date. The terms of office of members 10appointed by the Governor after June 30, 2022 shall be as 11follows: 2 initial members shall be appointed for terms of 2 12years, and 2 initial members shall be appointed for terms of 4 13years. Thereafter, the members appointed by the Governor shall 14hold office for 4 years, except that any member chosen to fill 15a vacancy occurring otherwise than by expiration of a term 16shall be appointed only for the unexpired term of the member 17whom he or she shall succeed. Board members may be 18reappointed. The Governor may remove a Governor's appointee to 19the Board for incompetence, neglect of duty, malfeasance, or 20inability to serve. 21    (c) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 22beginning January 1, 2016, Sections 1-110.15 and 1-110.6 of 23this Code shall be administered in accordance with this 24Section.25    (d) By April 1, 2016, the Illinois Investment Policy Board 26shall make its best efforts to identify all Iran-restricted   SB2462- 5 -LRB104 09315 RPS 19373 b1companies and , Sudan-restricted companies, and companies that 2boycott Israel and assemble those identified companies into a 3list of restricted companies, to be distributed to each 4retirement system.5    These efforts shall include the following, as appropriate 6in the Illinois Investment Policy Board's judgment:7        (1) reviewing and relying on publicly available 8    information regarding Iran-restricted companies and , 9    Sudan-restricted companies, and companies that boycott 10    Israel, including information provided by nonprofit 11    organizations, research firms, and government entities;12        (2) contacting asset managers contracted by the 13    retirement systems that invest in Iran-restricted 14    companies and , Sudan-restricted companies, and companies 15    that boycott Israel;16        (3) contacting other institutional investors that have 17    divested from or engaged with Iran-restricted companies 18    and , Sudan-restricted companies, and companies that 19    boycott Israel; and20        (4) retaining an independent research firm to identify 21    Iran-restricted companies and , Sudan-restricted 22    companies, and companies that boycott Israel.23    The Illinois Investment Policy Board shall review the list 24of restricted companies on a quarterly basis based on evolving 25information from, among other sources, those listed in this 26subsection (d) and distribute any updates to the list of   SB2462- 6 -LRB104 09315 RPS 19373 b1restricted companies to the retirement systems and the State 2Treasurer.3    By April 1, 2018, the Illinois Investment Policy Board 4shall make its best efforts to identify all expatriated 5entities and include those companies in the list of restricted 6companies distributed to each retirement system and the State 7Treasurer. These efforts shall include the following, as 8appropriate in the Illinois Investment Policy Board's 9judgment:10        (1) reviewing and relying on publicly available 11    information regarding expatriated entities, including 12    information provided by nonprofit organizations, research 13    firms, and government entities;14        (2) contacting asset managers contracted by the 15    retirement systems that invest in expatriated entities;16        (3) contacting other institutional investors that have 17    divested from or engaged with expatriated entities; and18        (4) retaining an independent research firm to identify 19    expatriated entities. 20    By July 1, 2022, the Illinois Investment Policy Board 21shall make its best efforts to identify all for-profit 22companies that contract to shelter migrant children and 23include those companies in the list of restricted companies 24distributed to each retirement system. These efforts shall 25include the following, as appropriate in the Illinois 26Investment Policy Board's judgment:   SB2462- 7 -LRB104 09315 RPS 19373 b1        (1) reviewing and relying on publicly available 2    information regarding for-profit companies that contract 3    to shelter migrant children, including information 4    provided by nonprofit organizations, research firms, and 5    government entities;6        (2) contacting asset managers contracted by the 7    retirement systems that invest in for-profit companies 8    that contract to shelter migrant children; 9        (3) contacting other institutional investors that have 10    divested from or engaged with for-profit companies that 11    contract to shelter migrant children; and12        (4) retaining an independent research firm to identify 13    for-profit companies that contract to shelter migrant 14    children. 15    No later than 6 months after the effective date of this 16amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly, the Illinois 17Investment Policy Board shall make its best efforts to 18identify all companies that are domiciled or have their 19principal place of business in Russia or Belarus and companies 20that are subject to Russian Harmful Foreign Activities 21Sanctions and include those companies in the list of 22restricted companies distributed to each retirement system. 23These efforts shall include the following, as appropriate in 24the Illinois Investment Policy Board's judgment: 25        (1) reviewing and relying on publicly available 26    information regarding companies that are domiciled or have   SB2462- 8 -LRB104 09315 RPS 19373 b1    their principal place of business in Russia or Belarus and 2    companies that are subject to Russian Harmful Foreign 3    Activities Sanctions, including information provided by 4    nonprofit organizations, research firms, and government 5    entities; 6        (2) contacting asset managers contracted by the 7    retirement systems that invest in companies that are 8    domiciled or have their principal place of business in 9    Russia or Belarus and companies that are subject to 10    Russian Harmful Foreign Activities Sanctions; 11        (3) contacting other institutional investors that have 12    divested from or engaged with companies that are domiciled 13    or have their principal place of business in Russia or 14    Belarus and companies that are subject to Russian Harmful 15    Foreign Activities Sanctions; and 16        (4) retaining an independent research firm to identify 17    companies that are domiciled or have their principal place 18    of business in Russia or Belarus and companies that are 19    subject to Russian Harmful Foreign Activities Sanctions. 20    (e) The Illinois Investment Policy Board shall adhere to 21the following procedures for companies on the list of 22restricted companies:23        (1) For each company newly identified in subsection 24    (d), the Illinois Investment Policy Board, unless it 25    determines by an affirmative vote that it is unfeasible, 26    shall send a written notice informing the company of its   SB2462- 9 -LRB104 09315 RPS 19373 b1    status and that it may become subject to divestment or 2    shareholder activism by the retirement systems.3        (2) If, following the Illinois Investment Policy 4    Board's engagement pursuant to this subsection (e) with a 5    restricted company, that company ceases activity that 6    designates the company to be an Iran-restricted company, a 7    Sudan-restricted company, a company that boycotts Israel, 8    an expatriated entity, or a for-profit company that 9    contracts to shelter migrant children, the company shall 10    be removed from the list of restricted companies and the 11    provisions of this Section shall cease to apply to it 12    unless it resumes such activities.13        (3) For a company that is domiciled or has its 14    principal place of business in Russia or Belarus, if, 15    following the Illinois Investment Policy Board's 16    engagement pursuant to this subsection (e), that company 17    is no longer domiciled or has its principal place of 18    business in Russia or Belarus, the company shall be 19    removed from the list of restricted companies and the 20    provisions of this Section shall cease to apply to it 21    unless it becomes domiciled or has its principal place of 22    business in Russia or Belarus. 23        (4) For a company that is subject to Russian Harmful 24    Foreign Activities Sanctions, if, following the Illinois 25    Investment Policy Board's engagement pursuant to this 26    subsection (e), that company is no longer subject to   SB2462- 10 -LRB104 09315 RPS 19373 b1    Russian Harmful Foreign Activities Sanctions, the company 2    shall be removed from the list of restricted companies and 3    the provisions of this Section shall cease to apply to it 4    unless it becomes subject to Russian Harmful Foreign 5    Activities Sanctions. 6    (f) Except as provided in subsection (f-1) of this Section 7the retirement system shall adhere to the following procedures 8for companies on the list of restricted companies:9        (1) The retirement system shall identify those 10    companies on the list of restricted companies in which the 11    retirement system owns direct holdings and indirect 12    holdings.13        (2) The retirement system shall instruct its 14    investment advisors to sell, redeem, divest, or withdraw 15    all direct holdings of restricted companies from the 16    retirement system's assets under management in an orderly 17    and fiduciarily responsible manner within 12 months after 18    the company's most recent appearance on the list of 19    restricted companies.20        (3) The retirement system may not acquire securities 21    of restricted companies.22        (4) The provisions of this subsection (f) do not apply 23    to the retirement system's indirect holdings or private 24    market funds. The Illinois Investment Policy Board shall 25    submit letters to the managers of those investment funds 26    containing restricted companies requesting that they   SB2462- 11 -LRB104 09315 RPS 19373 b1    consider removing the companies from the fund or create a 2    similar actively managed fund having indirect holdings 3    devoid of the companies. If the manager creates a similar 4    fund, the retirement system shall replace all applicable 5    investments with investments in the similar fund in an 6    expedited timeframe consistent with prudent investing 7    standards.8    (f-1) The retirement system shall adhere to the following 9procedures for restricted companies that are expatriated 10entities or for-profit companies that contract to shelter 11migrant children:12        (1) To the extent that the retirement system believes 13    that shareholder activism would be more impactful than 14    divestment, the retirement system shall have the authority 15    to engage with a restricted company prior to divesting.16        (2) Subject to any applicable State or Federal laws, 17    methods of shareholder activism utilized by the retirement 18    system may include, but are not limited to, bringing 19    shareholder resolutions and proxy voting on shareholder 20    resolutions.21        (3) The retirement system shall report on its 22    shareholder activism and the outcome of such efforts to 23    the Illinois Investment Policy Board by April 1 of each 24    year.25        (4) If the engagement efforts of the retirement system 26    are unsuccessful, then it shall adhere to the procedures   SB2462- 12 -LRB104 09315 RPS 19373 b1    under subsection (f) of this Section. 2    (f-5) Beginning on the effective date of this amendatory 3Act of the 102nd General Assembly, no retirement system shall 4invest moneys in Russian or Belarusian sovereign debt, Russian 5or Belarusian government-backed securities, any investment 6instrument issued by an entity that is domiciled or has its 7principal place of business in Russia or Belarus, or any 8investment instrument issued by a company that is subject to 9Russian Harmful Foreign Activities Sanctions, and no 10retirement system shall invest or deposit State moneys in any 11bank that is domiciled or has its principal place of business 12in Russia or Belarus. As soon as practicable after the 13effective date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd General 14Assembly, each retirement system shall instruct its investment 15advisors to sell, redeem, divest, or withdraw all direct 16holdings of Russian or Belarusian sovereign debt and direct 17holdings of Russian or Belarusian government-backed securities 18from the retirement system's assets under management in an 19orderly and fiduciarily responsible manner.20    Notwithstanding any provision of this Section to the 21contrary, a retirement system may cease divestment pursuant to 22this subsection (f-5) if clear and convincing evidence shows 23that the value of investments in such Russian or Belarusian 24sovereign debt and Russian or Belarusian government-backed 25securities becomes equal to or less than 0.05% of the market 26value of all assets under management by the retirement system.   SB2462- 13 -LRB104 09315 RPS 19373 b1For any cessation of divestment authorized by this subsection 2(f-5), the retirement system shall provide a written notice to 3the Illinois Investment Policy Board in advance of the 4cessation of divestment, setting forth the reasons and 5justification, supported by clear and convincing evidence, for 6its decision to cease divestment under this subsection (f-5). 7    The provisions of this subsection (f-5) do not apply to 8the retirement system's indirect holdings or private market 9funds. 10    (g) Upon request, and by April 1 of each year, each 11retirement system shall provide the Illinois Investment Policy 12Board with information regarding investments sold, redeemed, 13divested, or withdrawn in compliance with this Section.14    (h) Notwithstanding any provision of this Section to the 15contrary, a retirement system may cease divesting from 16companies pursuant to subsection (f) if clear and convincing 17evidence shows that the value of investments in such companies 18becomes equal to or less than 0.5% of the market value of all 19assets under management by the retirement system. For any 20cessation of divestment authorized by this subsection (h), the 21retirement system shall provide a written notice to the 22Illinois Investment Policy Board in advance of the cessation 23of divestment, setting forth the reasons and justification, 24supported by clear and convincing evidence, for its decision 25to cease divestment under subsection (f). 26    (i) The cost associated with the activities of the   SB2462- 14 -LRB104 09315 RPS 19373 b1Illinois Investment Policy Board shall be borne by the boards 2of each pension fund or investment board created under Article 315, 16, or 22A of this Code. 4    (j) With respect to actions taken in compliance with this 5Section, including all good-faith determinations regarding 6companies as required by this Section, the retirement system 7and Illinois Investment Policy Board are exempt from any 8conflicting statutory or common law obligations, including any 9fiduciary duties under this Article and any obligations with 10respect to choice of asset managers, investment funds, or 11investments for the retirement system's securities portfolios.12    (k) It is not the intent of the General Assembly in 13enacting this amendatory Act of the 99th General Assembly to 14cause divestiture from any company based in the United States 15of America. The Illinois Investment Policy Board shall 16consider this intent when developing or reviewing the list of 17restricted companies. 18    (l) If any provision of this amendatory Act of the 99th 19General Assembly or its application to any person or 20circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity of that provision 21or application does not affect other provisions or 22applications of this amendatory Act of the 99th General 23Assembly that can be given effect without the invalid 24provision or application.25    If any provision of Public Act 100-551 or its application 26to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity   SB2462- 15 -LRB104 09315 RPS 19373 b1of that provision or application does not affect other 2provisions or applications of Public Act 100-551 that can be 3given effect without the invalid provision or application. 4    If any provision of Public Act 102-118 or its application 5to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity 6of that provision or application does not affect other 7provisions or applications of Public Act 102-118 that can be 8given effect without the invalid provision or application. 9    If any provision of this amendatory Act of the 102nd 10General Assembly or its application to any person or 11circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity of that provision 12or application does not affect other provisions or 13applications of this amendatory Act of the 102nd General 14Assembly that can be given effect without the invalid 15provision or application. 16(Source: P.A. 102-118, eff. 7-23-21; 102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 17102-1108, eff. 12-21-22.) 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 19becoming law.